Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.250

Supplemental transportation allocation—Health care and pension benefits.

(1) A school district that experiences an increase in costs to a pupil transportation services contract as compared to prior year contract costs as a result of the provisions in RCW 28A.160.140 is eligible for supplemental transportation allocations as described in this section.

(2) Beginning September 1, 2024, school districts that provide pupil transportation through a contract with a nongovernmental entity under RCW 28A.160.140 must annually provide the office of the superintendent of public instruction with the following information:

(a) A breakdown of the total contract cost increase, including a detailed explanation of the increase by expenditure type demonstrating dollar equivalency as required in RCW 28A.160.140(2)(a)(i) and percentage equivalency as required in RCW 28A.160.140(2)(a)(ii), as defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and amount;

(b) A breakdown of cost from the contractor that shows the cost to provide health care and pension benefits to employees prior to June 6, 2024, and the cost to provide health care and pension benefits to employees after the implementation of benefits as described in RCW 28A.160.140;

(c) The amount of funding received through transportation allocations under RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.192 prior to the implementation of school employee benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW and the amount of funding received through the same transportation allocations for the period immediately following the implementation of school employee benefits under chapter 41.05 RCW, to determine the amount of funding for health care that is already being included in allocations.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may suspend the reporting requirements under subsection (2) of this section on or after September 1, 2027, for districts that do not request supplemental transportation allocations under this section.

(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must reimburse a school district for the increased cost that is directly attributable to increased benefits as required under chapter 313, Laws of 2024, using the following formula: The total contract cost increase, less any amounts not attributable to benefits required under RCW 28A.160.140, less the amount the allocation was increased based on the actual cost increase through the transportation funding formula.

[ 2024 c 313 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 313: See note following RCW 28A.160.140.